apertium-es-ca.es.dix
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>riese</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iertas</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierta</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iertos</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierto</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rimos</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rís</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>res</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ramos</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ráis</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ras</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ran</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="áb/rir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ran</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="abrir">
      <p>
        <l>áb</l>
        <r>ab</r>
      </p>
      <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="cubrir">
      <p>
        <l>cúb</l>
        <r>cub</r>
      </p>
      <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="descubrir">
      <p>
        <l>descúb</l>
        <r>descub</r>
      </p>
      <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="encubrir">
      <p>
        <l>encúb</l>
        <r>encub</r>
      </p>
      <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="reabrir">
      <p>
        <l>reáb</l>
        <r>reab</r>
      </p>
      <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
    </e>
     <e lm="recubrir" a="prompsit2adn">
        <p>
          <l>recúb</l>
          <r>recub</r>
        </p>
        <par n="áb/rir__vblex"/>
     </e>
